Hawaii statutes.
[§171-50.1] Acquisition of lands for
exchange under chapter 516. The board may acquire private lands by
negotiated purchase to be exchanged to effect the conversion of leasehold lands
to fee simple ownership under section 171-50.2. The legislature declares that
such acquisition is for the public purpose of encouraging home ownership on as
widespread a basis as possible. [L 1975, c 184, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next